src/fst/morphology/stems/propernouns.lexc
!**************************************************************************
! E. Uí Dhonnchadha 
! 2023
! Organisations
! 2024 added +Sem/Org for semantic tagging NER (named entity recognition)
!**************************************************************************
LEXICON NP-LEX-ORG
< S i n n %  F é i n %+Sem%/Org:0 %+Prop:0 %+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Com:0 %+Sg:0 >	#; !! 
< F i a n n a %  F á i l %+Sem%/Org:0 %+Prop:0 %+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Com:0 %+Sg:0 >	#; !! 
< F i n e %  G a e l %+Sem%/Org:0 %+Prop:0 %+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Com:0 %+Sg:0 >	#; !! 
< L u c h t %  O i b r e  %+Sem%/Org:0 %+Prop:0 %+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Com:0 %+Sg:0 >	#; !! 
< O n e %  D i r e c t i o n  %+Sem%/Group%_Hum:0 %+Prop:0 %+Noun:0 %+Masc:0 %+Com:0 %+Sg:0 >	#; !! 

anois+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Anois      #; 
anois+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:ANOIS      #; 
O2+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:O2      #;
U2+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:U2      #; 
Childline+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Childline      #; 
McDonalds+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:McDonalds      #; 

Google+Sem/Org+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Google      #; 
eBay+Sem/Org+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:eBay      #; 
Twitter+Sem/Org+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Twitter      #; 
Facebook+Sem/Org+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Facebook      #; 
Skype+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Skype      #; 
Moodle+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Moodle      #; 
Instagram+Sem/Org+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Instagram      #; 
Snapchat+Sem/Org+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Snapchat      #; 
Netflix+Sem/Org+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Netflix      #; 
YouTube+Sem/Org+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:YouTube      #; 
iPad+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:iPad      #; 
iPhone+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:iPhone      #; 

Roinn% an% Taoisigh+MWE:Roinn% an% Taoisigh	NP-PLACE;	!TROND
Áras% an% Uachtaráin+MWE:Áras% an% Uachtaráin	NP-PLACE; !president's house
Parlaimint% na% hEorpa+MWE:Parlaimint% na% hEorpa	NP-PLACE;
Parlaimint% na% hEorpa+MWE+Err/Orth:Parlaimint% an% Eoraip	NP-PLACE; !Err/Orth
Dáil% Éireann+MWE+Err/Orth:Dáil% Éire NP-PLACE-fem; !Err/Orth
Dáil% Éireann+MWE:Dáil% Éireann NP-PLACE-fem;
!!!!Dáil Éire !Err/Orth
Bus% Éireann+MWE:Bus% Éireann	NP-PLACE;
Bus% Éireann+MWE+Err/Orth:Bus% Éire 	NP-PLACE; !Err/Orth
Raidió% Teilifís% Éireann+MWE:Raidió% Teilifís% Éireann  	NP-PLACE;
Raidió% Teilifís% Éireann+MWE+Err/Orth:Raidió% Teilifís% Éire  	NP-PLACE; !Err/Orth
Met% Éireann+MWE:Met% Éireann NP-PLACE-fem;
Met% Éireann+MWE+Err/Orth:Met% Éire NP-PLACE-fem; !Err/Orth
!!!! "hÉire" Prop Noun Fem Gen Sg DefArt (people of the Ireland)
Iarnród% Éireann+MWE:Iarnród% Éireann  	NP-PLACE; 
Iarnród% Éireann+MWE+Err/Orth:Iarnród% Éire  	NP-PLACE;
!!!! Muintir na hÉireann, Uachtarán na hIodáile


LEXICON NP-Irregular

Gaeilge:	NPI-Gaeilge;
Gaelainn:	NPI-Gaelainn;
Éire:		NPI-Éire;
Londain:	NPI-Londain;
Meiriceá:	NPI-Meiriceá;
Sasana:		NPI-Sasana;
Eoraip:		NPI-Eoraip;
Breatain:	NPI-Breatain;
Life:		NPI-Life;
Conall:		NPI-Conall;
Feirste:	NPI-Feirste;
Uladh:		NPI-Uladh;

Éireannach:	NPI-Éireannach;
Eorpach:	NPI-Eorpach;


LEXICON NPI-Gaeilge
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Gaeilge		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg+DefArt:Ghaeilge		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Gaeilge		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Gaeilge		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg+Len:Ghaeilge			#;

LEXICON NPI-Gaelainn
+CM+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Gaelainn	InitMut;
+CM+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg+DefArt:Ghaelainn	#;
+CM+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Gaelainne	#;
+CM+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Gaelainne	#;
+CM+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg+Len:Ghaelainn		#;


LEXICON NPI-Éire
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Éire			InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Éireann	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:hÉireann	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Dat+Sg:Éirinn		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Dat+Sg+hPref:hÉirinn		#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Éire			#;

LEXICON NPI-Londain
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Londain		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Londan	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Londain		#;

LEXICON NPI-Meiriceá
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Meiriceá		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+Len:Mheiriceá	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg+Len:Mheiriceá	#;

LEXICON NPI-Sasana
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Sasana			InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Shasana	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg+Len:Shasana		#;

LEXICON NPI-Eoraip
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Eoraip	InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg+DefArt:hEorpa	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Eoraip	#;

LEXICON NPI-Breatain
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Breatain		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Breataine	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg+Len:Bhreatain	#;

LEXICON NPI-Life
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Com+Sg:Life		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Gen+Sg:Life	#;
+Prop+Noun+Fem+Voc+Sg:Life	#;

LEXICON NPI-Éireannach
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Éireannach		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Éireannaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:Éireannach		#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:Éireannaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl+DefArt:hÉireannaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:Éireannach	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl+DefArt:n-Éireannach	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl:Éireannaigh	#;

LEXICON NPI-Eorpach
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Eorpach		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Eorpaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Eorpaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg:Eorpach	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl:Eorpaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Pl+DefArt:hEorpaigh	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl:Eorpach	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Weak+Pl+DefArt:n-Eorpach	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc+Pl+DefArt:Eorpaigh	#;


LEXICON NPI-Conall
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Conall		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+DefArt:Chonaill	#;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Voc+Sg+Len:Chonall	#;

LEXICON NPI-Feirste
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Feirste	#;

LEXICON NPI-Uladh
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Com+Sg:Uladh		InitMut;
+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Ulaidh		#;   !!!!! check this 


!----------------------------------------------------------------------------
! this Class only used by irregular proper nouns above (NPI lexicons)
LEXICON InitMut
#;
+Len:^IM^Sé		#;
+Ecl:^IM^Urú	#;
!----------------------------------------------------------------------------
LEXICON NP-LEX-LOGAINM
Airgidín		NP-PLACE;	! ID: 1372017; English: Argideen
Airglinn		NP-PLACE;	! ID: 129407; English: Araglin
Boirneán		NP-PLACE;	! ID: 30601; English: Morenane
Boistimín		NP-PLACE;	! ID: 26267; English: Bushtameen
Coilleachán		NP-PLACE;	! ID: 3872; English: Cuillaghan
Coilligeán		NP-PLACE;	! ID: 2375; English: Colligan
< A b h a %_:%  B h a i l e %_:%  a n %_:%  M h u i l i n n >	NP-PLACE;	! ID: 116434; English: Milltown
< A b h a %_:%  B h a r r %_:%  D u í n s e >			NP-PLACE;	! ID: 1395062; English: Bardinch River
< B á %_:%  n a %_:%  C u a i l l í >				NP-PLACE;	! ID: 1165490; English: Coulagh Bay
< B á %_:%  n a %_:%  M a i g h n e >				NP-PLACE;	! ID: 104243; English: Moyne Bay
< C a r r a i g %_:%  a n %_:%  A i b h n í n >			NP-PLACE;	! ID: 1397620; English: Carrickanevneen
< C a r r a i g %_:%  a n %_:%  A i r d >				NP-PLACE;	! ID: 50372; English: Carriganard

!!GENITIVE FORMS

Abartach+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Abartaí		#;	! ID: 50573; English: Abartagh; Base: Abartach {Abartaí}
Abhóca+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg:Abhóca		#;	! ID: 55230; English: Avoca; Base: Abhóca {Abhóca}
Bacastún+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Len:Bhacastúin	#;	! ID: 17111; English: Backstown; Base: Bacastún {Bhacastúin}
Bachaill+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Len:Bhacaille	#;	! ID: 40151; English: Boughill; Base: Bachaill {Bhacaille}
Baicstiall+Prop+Noun+Masc+Gen+Sg+Len:Bhaicstéille #;	! ID: 42205; English: Backsteel; Base: Baicstiall {Bhaicstéille}
